Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,350
Moving across streets or a turnaround; authorized.

Nothing in sections 60-678 and 60-6,348 to 60-6,351 shall prohibit occasional necessary movement of vehicles described in section 60-6,349 on streets for purposes of moving the vehicle across streets or a turnaround on the streets. All such vehicles when used under this section shall be exempt from all motor vehicle legal requirements.

Laws 1971, LB 644, § 9;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 133;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 60-2104;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 446.